North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-21 Tree Bounty [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 62, § 18]

4-21-01.
Bounty for tree planting — Amount — Deduction of taxes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 187, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2082; S.L. 1907, ch. 41, § 1; 1909, ch. 50, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2813; S.L. 1915, ch. 262, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2813; S.L. 1933, ch. 268, § 1; 1937, ch. 252, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 4-2101; S.L. 1945, ch. 267; 1957 Supp., § 4-2101; repealed by 2015, ch. 62, § 18, effective August 1, 2015.

4-21-02.
Bounty for planting trees or hedges along highways — Regulations governing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 187, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 2083; C.L. 1913, § 2814; S.L. 1937, ch. 252, § 2; 1939, ch. 244, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 4-2102; repealed by 2015, ch. 62, § 18, effective August 1, 2015.

4-21-03.
Reports required to secure tree bounty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 187, § 3; R.C. 1905, § 2084; S.L. 1911, ch. 308, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2815; S.L. 1937, ch. 252, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2103; repealed by 2015, ch. 62, § 18, effective August 1, 2015.

4-21-04.
Assessor to examine trees and groves — Report made by assessor. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 187, § 4; R.C. 1905, § 2085; C.L. 1913, § 2816; S.L. 1937, ch. 252, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 4-2104; repealed by 2015, ch. 62, § 18, effective August 1, 2015.

4-21-05.
No bounty for plantings on railroad right of way or timber culture lands. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 252, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2105; repealed by 2015, sb2053, § 18, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2015, ch. 62, § 18, effective August 1, 2015.